Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4016
Judicial relief.

(1) The following persons may petition
a court to construe a power of attorney or review the agent's conduct and
grant appropriate relief:

(a) The principal or
the agent;

(b)
A guardian, conservator, or other fiduciary acting for the principal;

(c) A person authorized
to make health care decisions for the principal;

(d) The principal's spouse, parent,
or issue;

(e)
An individual who would qualify as a presumptive heir of the principal or
would otherwise qualify as a devisee under a will that remains unrevoked;

(f) A person named as
a beneficiary to receive any property, benefit, or contractual right on the
principal's death or as a beneficiary of a trust created by or for the principal
that has a financial interest in the principal's estate;

(g) A governmental agency
having regulatory authority to protect the welfare of the principal;

(h) The principal's caregiver
or another person that demonstrates sufficient interest in the principal's
welfare; and

(i)
A person asked to accept the power of attorney.

(2) Upon motion by the principal,
the court shall dismiss a petition filed under this section, unless the court
finds that the principal lacks capacity to revoke the agent's authority or
the power of attorney.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 16.

Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act conferred standing on children claiming in district court that transfers of their late father's assets were an abuse of their stepmother's power of attorney. Kimball v. Rosedale Ranch, 319 Neb. 650, 24 N.W.3d 841 (2025).

Subsection (1)(e) of this section pertains to a "presumptive heir," which necessarily relates to a decedent's blood relatives. In re Trust of Cook, 28 Neb. App. 624, 947 N.W.2d 870 (2020).